Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,155
Certificate of authority; suspension, revocation, or denial; administrative penalty; procedure.

A certificate of authority shall be suspended or revoked, an application for a certificate of authority denied, or an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to section 44-32,164 only after compliance with the requirements of sections 44-32,156 to 44-32,158.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 64.